Utah statutes.
76-3-409.   Child abuse or sex offense against child -- Treatment of
offender or victim -- Payment of costs.
(1)  Any person convicted in the district court of child abuse, or a sexual
offense if the victim is under 18 years of age, may be ordered to participate
in treatment or therapy under the supervision of the adult probation and
parole section of the Department of Corrections, in cooperation with the
division of children, youth, and families until the court is satisfied that
such treatment or therapy has been successful or that no further benefit to
the convicted offender would result if such treatment or therapy were
continued.  The court may also order treatment of the victim if it believes
the same would be beneficial under the circumstances.  Nothing in this section
shall preclude the court from imposing any additional sentence as provided by
law.
(2)  The convicted offender shall be ordered to pay, to the extent that he or
she is able, the costs of his or her treatment, together with treatment costs
incurred by the victim and any administrative costs incurred by the
appropriate state agency in the supervision of such treatment.  If the
convicted offender is unable to pay all or part of the costs of treatment, the
court may order the appropriate state agency to pay such costs to the extent
funding is provided by the Legislature for such purpose and shall order the
convicted offender to perform public service work as compensation for the cost
of treatment.
